Utah statutes.
31A-21-110.   Prohibition against certain use of Social Security number -- Exceptions -- Applicability of section.

(1)  As used in this section "publicly display or publicly post" means to intentionally communicate or otherwise make available to the general public.

(2)  An insurer not subject to Section 31A-22-634 may not do any of the following:

(a)  publicly display or publicly post in any manner an individual's Social Security number; or

(b)  print an individual's Social Security number on any card required for the individual to access products or services provided or covered by the insurer.

(3)  This section does not prevent:

(a)  the collection, use, or release of a Social Security number as required by state or federal law;

(b)  the use of a Social Security number for internal verification or administrative purposes; or

(c)  the release of a Social Security number:

(i)  for claims administration purposes; or

(ii)  as part of the verification, eligibility, or payment process.

(4) (a)  An insurer shall comply with this section by July 1, 2005.

(b)  An insurer may obtain an extension for compliance with this section in accordance with this Subsection (4)(b).

(i)  The request for extension shall:

(A)  be in writing to the department prior to July 1, 2005; and

(B)  provide an explanation as to why the insurer cannot comply.

(ii)  The commissioner shall grant a request for extension:

(A)  for a period of time not to exceed March 1, 2006; and

(B)  if the commissioner finds that the explanation provided under Subsection (4)(b)(i) is a reasonable explanation.

